Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 1. In General

§ 18-7-101.
Prerequisites to appropriate money for establishment and maintenance of library; payment of expenses.

When the board of county commissioners has received sufficient guarantees whether in the forms of conveyances or bonds of citizens, associations or corporations that a suitable place will be permanently furnished for the operation and use of a public library, it shall annually provide through property tax or otherwise for the establishment and maintenance of a public library at the county seat of the county. Whenever suitable library quarters are acquired, the county library board of directors may expend the revenue budgeted for the maintenance and operation of the county library and the county library system.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 10, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 684; R.S. 1899, § 1019; Laws 1901, ch. 72, § 1; 1907, ch. 45, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1316; C.S. 1920, § 1563; R.S. 1931, § 29-901; C.S. 1945, § 26-601; Laws 1947, ch. 25, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-309; Laws 1961, ch. 32, § 1; 1967, ch. 160, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1982, ch. 22, § 1.

Property of association. —

A library organized under the provisions of this article, including the building and books, belonged to a library association; and when a new county was carved out of the original county, the building and books belonged to the association and were not to be considered as assets in apportioning the indebtedness between the counties. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 25 Wyo. 172, 166 P. 674,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1917).

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227 (1950).

§ 18-7-102.
Manner of levying and collecting tax; library fund.

The county library tax shall be levied and collected as other county taxes and the money collected shall be set apart as the county library fund. Nothing herein shall be construed to authorize any levy in excess of those authorized by law.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 10, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 685; R.S. 1899, § 1020; Laws 1907, ch. 45, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 1317; C.S. 1920, § 1564; R.S. 1931, § 29-902; C.S. 1945, § 26-602; W.S. 1957, § 18-310; Laws 1961, ch. 32, § 2; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-7-103.
Library fund under control of board of directors; appointment, powers, duties, terms of directors; manner of filling vacancies on board.

The control, use and disposition of the county library fund is entrusted to the county library board of directors which shall budget and expend the fund for the maintenance, operation and promotion of the county library and county library system in order to carry out the informational, educational, cultural and recreational role of the county library.

The county library board of directors shall be appointed by the county commissioners and shall be composed of not less than three (3) and not more than five (5) competent and responsible residents who are representative of the entire county and who shall serve without compensation. Before entering upon his duties the treasurer of the county library board shall execute and deposit with the county commissioners a good and sufficient bond for the faithful performance of his duties in an amount required by the county commissioners. The bond shall be payable to the people of the state of Wyoming and be approved by the county commissioners. One (1) director shall be appointed for one (1) year, one (1) director (or two (2) if the board consists of four (4) or five (5) members) shall be appointed for two (2) years, and one (1) director (or two (2), if the board consists of five (5) directors) shall be appointed for three (3) years, each term to commence on July 1 following the appointment. Thereafter the county commissioners shall before July 1 of each year appoint a director or directors to replace the retiring director or directors for a term of three (3) years and until a successor is appointed. A director may be appointed for two (2) consecutive terms and shall not be eligible for reappointment until two (2) years after the expiration of his second term.

The county commissioners may remove any director for misconduct or neglect of duty. Vacancies on the board of directors shall be filled by the county commissioners for the balance of the unexpired term created by the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 10, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 686; Laws 1899, ch. 46, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1021; Laws 1907, ch. 45, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 1318; C.S. 1920, § 1565; R.S. 1931, § 29-903; C.S. 1945, § 26-603; W.S. 1957, § 18-311; Laws 1961, ch. 32, § 3; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1982, ch. 19, § 1.

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 25 Wyo. 172, 166 P. 674,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1917).

§ 18-7-104.
Authority of board to receive and dispose of property; appointment of librarian; library staff.

The library board of directors may receive and be responsible for real estate, money or other property to aid the establishment, maintenance or operation of the county library system. If received as a donation, they shall carefully observe as the trustee the conditions accompanying every such gift. When the board of directors determines it is in the best interests of the county library and in keeping with the purpose of the donor, it may with the approval of the board of county commissioners sell, exchange or otherwise dispose of such real estate or other property. The board of directors shall appoint a competent librarian who with the approval of the board of directors shall appoint a library staff. The duties and compensation of the staff shall be determined by the board.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 10, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 687; R.S. 1899, § 1022; Laws 1907, ch. 45, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 1319; C.S. 1920, § 1566; R.S. 1931, § 29-904; C.S. 1945, § 26-604; W.S. 1957, § 18-312; Laws 1961, ch. 32, § 4; 1965, ch. 23, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 25 Wyo. 172, 166 P. 674,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1917).

§ 18-7-105.
Organization of board; rules and regulations; filing of certificate of organization; incorporation; recovery of library materials; establishment of branch libraries; cooperative library service.

Every library board of directors shall elect a chairman and other officers as necessary and shall prescribe rules and regulations for the establishment, organization, operation and use of the county library and library system. The board shall enforce such rules and regulations in any court of competent jurisdiction. As soon as the board is organized they shall file with the county clerk and with the secretary of state a certificate showing their organization, for which no filing fee or charge shall be paid.

Upon filing of the certificate the board of directors is a body corporate, with power to sue and be sued under the name on file with the secretary of state.

No member of the board of directors is personally liable for any action or procedure of the board. The corporation has perpetual existence and it is not necessary to file any other or further certificate than that filed upon the original organization of the board of directors. Every library established and maintained under the provisions of W.S.

18-7-101

through

18-7-106

is free to all residents of the county on the condition that such persons comply with rules and regulations of the library as prescribed by the board of directors. Holders of library cards are responsible for all library materials borrowed on such cards. Whenever library materials are lost, destroyed or taken from the library and not returned the library board may institute proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover the materials or the value thereof. The library board may establish and maintain branch libraries, stations and other library services and facilities.

Two (2) or more county library boards may contract to establish a federation of the libraries under their jurisdiction for the purpose of providing cooperative library services. Contracts shall be written, signed by the members of the contracting library boards and are binding upon the contracting library boards and their successors. The participating libraries may reserve the right to terminate the contracts by mutual agreement upon ninety (90) days written notice given to each contracting library board.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 10, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 688; R.S. 1899, § 1023; Laws 1907, ch. 45, § 5; C.S. 1910, § 1320; C.S. 1920, § 1567; Laws 1921, ch. 25, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 29-906; C.S. 1945, § 26-605; W.S. 1957, § 18-313; Laws 1961, ch. 32, § 5; 1965, ch. 23, § 2; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 210, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), substituted “on file with the secretary of state” for “of ‘Board of Directors of the County Library of
. . . . .
County’, or the board by resolution filed as provided for filing of certificate of organization, may designate itself as ‘Board of Directors of Carnegie Public Library of
. . . . .
County.’”

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 25 Wyo. 172, 166 P. 674,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1917).

§ 18-7-106.
Directors to keep records and make annual report.

Each library board of directors shall keep a record of all its proceedings, file in the library all vouchers for expenditures, and after the close of the fiscal year submit an annual financial, statistical and operational report to the county commissioners and to the Wyoming state library. Whenever practical the annual report shall contain information and data requested or required by the county commissioners and the Wyoming state library.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 10, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 689; R.S. 1899, § 1024; Laws 1907, ch. 45, § 6; C.S. 1910, § 1321; C.S. 1920, § 1568; R.S. 1931, § 29-907; C.S. 1945, § 26-606; W.S. 1957, § 18-314; Laws 1961, ch. 32, § 6; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 25 Wyo. 172, 166 P. 674,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1917).